Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 2. Administrative Provisions

§ 1011.
Transition to other programs.

The Department shall transfer the family to Reach Up, a separate State program, or a solely State-funded program established under chapter 11 of this title if, after four months of receiving support in Reach First or sooner at the Department’s discretion, a family is assessed to need ongoing financial assistance and the family is financially eligible for Reach Up, a separate State program, or a solely State-funded program established under chapter 11 of this title, unless the family chooses not to participate.

If a family finds employment meeting or exceeding the work requirements for Reach Up for the family’s size and composition, but is financially eligible for Reach Up, the Department shall transfer the family to Reach Up, unless the family chooses not to participate. A family transferring from Reach First to Reach Up shall be treated as a recipient for the purposes of income calculation.

If a family finds employment meeting or exceeding the work requirements for Reach Up for the family’s size and composition, is not financially eligible for Reach Up, and is eligible for the Reach Ahead program, the Department shall transfer the family to Reach Ahead, unless the family chooses not to participate. A family transferring from Reach First to Reach Ahead shall be treated as a recipient for the purposes of income calculation.

A family transferring to another program under subsections (a) through (c) of this section shall not be required to complete a new application. Verification of income or other documentation may be required as provided for by rule.

Transitional medical assistance of up to 36 months shall be provided to families with a working adult who leaves Reach First and is not eligible for Reach Up, as provided for in the Vermont Medicaid rule M302.21 in effect on May 1, 2007, provided that federal financial participation is available for such transitional medical assistance.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 30

, § 1, eff. May 17, 2007; amended

2009, No. 67

(Adj. Sess.), § 92, eff. Feb. 25, 2010.

§ 1012.
Notice and appeal.

A participant may appeal decisions in accordance with

3 V.S.A. § 3091

. The Commissioner shall provide notice to each participant of the standards and procedures applicable to such appeals. All federal and Agency of Human Services rules regarding conciliation, notice, hearing, and appeal shall be followed in connection with such appeals.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 30

, § 1, eff. May 17, 2007.